South Dakota, session 2026, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-21-4 be AMENDED:
22-21-4. No individual, without the consent or knowledge of the individual
depicted or recorded, and with the intent to self-gratify or alarm, annoy, embarrass,
harass, invade the privacy of, threaten, or cause emotional, financial, physical,
psychological, or reputational harm to that individual, may:
(1) Intentionally use any device to photograph or visually record the individual without
clothing or under or through the clothing, or with a third individual depicted in a
sexual act, for the purpose of viewing the body of, or the undergarments worn by,
the individual;
(2) Intentionally disclose, disseminate, distribute, sell, or use, by any means, any
recording or photograph described in subdivision (1); or
(3) Knowingly and intentionally create, disclose, disseminate, distribute, or sell, by any
means, digitally fabricated material depicting the identifiable individual:
(a) In a state of nudity, as defined in § 22-24A-2, such that an ordinary person
viewing the material would conclude that the depiction is of the identifiable
individual in such a state of nudity; or
(b) Engaging in sexual contact, sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or
sexually explicit conduct such that an ordinary person viewing the material
would conclude that the depiction is of the identifiable individual engaging
in sexual contact, sexual intercourse, deviant sexual activity, or sexually
explicit conduct.

26.454.11 2 41
A violation of subdivision (1) or (2) is a Class 1 misdemeanor, unless the victim is
seventeen years of age or younger and the perpetrator is at least twenty-one years of age
at the time the photograph or recording is made, in which case the violation is a Class 6
felony. Any subsequent violation of subdivision (1) or (2) is a Class 6 felony. A violation
of subdivision (3) is a Class 5 felony.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-21:
Terms used in § 22-21-4 mean:
(1) "Digitally fabricated material," an image, photograph, video, or other visual
depiction that:
(a) Appears to an ordinary person to be an authentic depiction of an identifiable
individual; and
(b) Is adapted, generated, or modified to falsely depict an individual's
appearance, conduct, or voice; and
(2) "Identifiable," recognizable as a specific individual by the individual's face, likeness,
or other distinguishing characteristics.
SB41 ENROLLED

26.454.11 3 41
An Act to revise a provision related to criminal invasions of privacy, prohibit the creation and
distribution of digitally fabricated material of an identifiable individual, and provide penalties
therefor.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 41
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 41 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB41 ENROLLED